New Jersey, session 222, S555.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.185 (C.18A:35-4.5a) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Each school district shall incorporate age-appropriate sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention education in grades preschool through 12 as part of the district's implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  The educational content shall include, among other subject matter, instruction on Internet safety and the dangers of online predators.  The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Department of Children and Families, the New Jersey Coalition Against Sexual Assault, Prevent Child Abuse New Jersey, the New Jersey Children's Alliance, the New Jersey Coalition Against Human Trafficking, and other entities with relevant expertise, shall provide school districts with age-appropriate sample learning activities and resources. (cf: P.L.2019, c.185, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect on the 30th day after the date of enactment. STATEMENT Current law requires each school district to incorporate age-appropriate sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention education in grades preschool through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  The bill amends this requirement to provide that the required educational content will include, among other subject matter, instruction on Internet safety and the dangers of online predators.  The bill also includes the New Jersey Coalition Against Human Trafficking among the entities that the Commissioner of Education must consult when providing school districts with age-appropriate sample learning activities and resources in order to effectuate this section of law.